es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Pañales y cuidado del bebé: Dispensadores y calentadores de toallitas para bebés; Toallitas infantiles; Cambiadores y protectores para cambiadores; Cambiadores para bebés; Kits de pañales; Forros para pañales; Organizadores de pañales; Accesorios para contenedores de pañales; Contenedores de pañales; Tratamientos para la dermatitis; Bolsas para pañales usados; Pañales
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Vystymas: Servetėlių kūdikiams dalytuvai ir šildytuvai; Servetėlės kūdikiams; Vystymo patiesalų ir padėklų uždangalai; Vystymo patiesalai ir padėklai; Sauskelnių rinkiniai; Sauskelnių įdėklai; Sauskelnių dėklai; Sauskelnių kibirų priedai; Sauskelnių kibirai; Vystyklų dermatito gydymas; Maišeliai šlapiems vystyklams; Sauskelnės
ko: 영유아 > 기저귀용품: 아기 물티슈 디스펜서/워머; 아기 물티슈; 기저귀 교체 매트/트레이 커버; 기저귀 교체 매트/트레이; 기저귀 키트; 기저귀 라이너; 기저귀 정리함; 기저귀 쓰레기통 부대용품; 기저귀 휴지통; 기저귀 발진 치료제; 기저귀 방수 가방; 기저귀
ja: ベビー用品 > おむつ用品: おしりふき用ディスペンサー・ウォーマー; おしりふき; おむつ替えマット・交換台カバー; おむつ替え台・マット; おむつ用品セット; おむつシート; おむつ収納; おむつ用ゴミ箱関連用品; おむつ処理ポット; おむつかぶれ対策; おむつ処理袋; おむつ
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Pelenaštvo: Držači i grijači maramica za bebe; Maramice za bebe; Navlake za podloge i tvrde podloge za previjanje; Podloge i tvrde podloge za previjanje; Setovi pelena; Ulošci za pelene; Organizatori za pelene; Pribor za kante za pelene; Kante za pelene; Liječenje pelenskog osipa; Mokre vreće za pelene; Pelene
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Ornamentação: Aquecedores e distribuidores de fraldas para bebé; Fraldas para bebé; Coberturas para tapetes de mudas e tabuleiros; Tapetes de mudas e tabuleiros; Kits de fraldas; Forros de fraldas; Organizadores de fraldas; Acessórios de contentores de fraldas; Contentores de fraldas; Tratamentos para assaduras de fraldas; Sacos impermeáveis para fraldas; Fraldas
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Przewijanie: Zasobniki i podgrzewacze na chusteczki dla niemowląt; Chusteczki dla niemowląt; Maty i blaty do przewijania; Maty i lady do przewijania; Zestawy do przewijania; Ceraty do pieluch; Organizery na pieluchy; Akcesoria do kubłów na pieluchy; Kubły na pieluchy; Środki na wysypkę pieluszkową; Woreczki na pieluchy; Pieluchy
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การเปลี่ยนผ้าอ้อม: ที่จ่ายและอุ่นกระดาษชำระเปียก; ทิชชู่เปียกสำหรับทารก; แผ่นรองเปลี่ยนและที่รองถาด; ที่รองและถาดเปลี่ยนผ้าอ้อม; ชุดผ้าอ้อม; ซับในผ้าอ้อม; ที่จัดระเบียบผ้าอ้อม; อุปกรณ์ถังใส่ผ้าอ้อมที่ใช้แล้ว; ที่ใส่ผ้าอ้อมใช้แล้ว; ผลิตภัณฑ์กันผื่นผ้าอ้อม; ถุงใส่ผ้าอ้อมกันน้ำ; ผ้าอ้อม
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 尿布相关用品: 婴儿湿巾盒/湿巾加热器; 婴儿湿巾; 换尿布垫/换尿布台罩子; 换尿布垫/台; 尿布用品套装; 尿布衬垫; 尿布收纳用品; 尿布桶配件; 纸尿裤桶; 防尿疹护臀产品; 防水尿布收纳袋; 尿布
da: Baby og småbørn > Bleskift: Beholdere og opvarmere til vaskeklude; Babyvådservietter; Betræk til skiftepude og -underlag; Skifteunderlag og bakker; Ble – sæt; Ble – omslag; Ble – puslestation; Blespand – tilbehør; Blespande; Ble – udslætsbehandling; Ble – vandtætte poser; Bleer
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vaippatarvikkeet: Vauvan kosteuspyyheautomaatit ja -lämmittimet; Vauvan kosteuspyyhkeet; Hoitoalustan ja -tason suojat; Hoitoalustat ja -tasot; Vaippapakkaukset; Vaippasuojat; Vaippojen säilytysratkaisut; Vaipparoskistarvikkeet; Vaipparoskikset; Vaippaihottuman hoito; Vaippapyykkikassit; Vaipat
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Alt Alma Ürünleri: Bebekler için Islak Mendil Dispanserleri ve Mendil Isıtıcıları; Bebek Islak Mendilleri; Bebek Alt Alma Matı ve Tepsisi Örtüleri; Bez Değiştirme Matları ve Alanları; Bebek Alt Alma Setleri; Bebek Bezi Astarları; Bebek Bezi Kutuları; Bebek Bezi Çöp Kovası Aksesuarları; Bebek Bezi Çöp Kovası Sistemi; Pişik Tedavi Ürünleri; Kirli Bebek Bezi Çantaları; Bebek Bezleri
sk-SK: Bábätká > Prebaľovanie: Zásobníky a ohrievače detských obrúskov; Detské obrúsky; Poťahy prebaľovacích podložiek/pultov; Prebaľovacie podložky/pulty; Súpravy na prebaľovanie; Vložky do plienok; Organizéry na plienky; Príslušenstvo ku košom na plienky; Koše na plienky; Liečba plienkovej dermatitídy; Nepremokavé vrecká na plienky; Plienky
sv: Baby och småbarn > Blöjbyte: Hållare och värmare för babyvåtservetter; Babyvåtservetter; Skötbädd och skötbäddsskydd; Mattor och brickor för blöjbyte; Blöjpaket; Blöjinlägg; Blöjförvaring; Tillbehör till blöjhinkar; Blöjhinkar; Behandlingar mot blöjeksem; Blöjpåsar; Blöjor
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 尿布: 嬰兒濕紙巾盒和濕紙巾加熱器; 嬰兒柔濕巾; 嬰兒更衣墊; 換尿布墊和換尿布台; 尿布更換用具組; 尿布內襯; 尿布收納袋; 尿布桶配件; 尿布桶; 尿布疹藥品; 尿布袋; 嬰童尿布
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Articole scutece: Dozatoare și încălzitoare de șervețele pentru copii; Șervețele pentru copii; Huse covoraș și tavă pentru înfășat; Covorașe și tăvi de înfășat; Seturi scutece; Inserții pentru scutece; Organizatoare pentru scutece; Accesorii pentru coșuri pentru scutece; Coșuri pentru scutece; Tratamente pentru erupții de scutec; Pungi impermeabile pentru scutece; Scutece
it: Bebè e bimbi > Cambio pannolini: Distributori e riscaldatori di salviettine per bebè; Salviettine; Coprifasciatoio; Materassini fasciatoio; Kit per pannolini; Fodere per pannolini; Contenitori per pannolini; Accessori per secchi per pannolini; Secchi per pannolini; Prodotti sfogo da pannolino; Borse per pannolini bagnati; Pannolini
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Pelenkázás: Baba törlőkendő-adagolók és -melegítők; Baba törlőkendők; Pelenkázószőnyeg és -tálca-huzatok; Pelenkázószőnyegek és -tálcák; Pelenkakészletek; Pelenkabetétek; Pelenkarendezők; Pelenkavödör-kiegészítők; Pelenkavödrök; Pelenkakiütés-kezelések; Pelenka nedves táskák; Pelenkák
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Смяна на пелени: Диспенсъри и нагреватели за бебешки кърпички; Бебешки кърпички; Покривала за подложки и плотове за повиване; Повивалници и маси за повиване; Комплекти пелени; Вложки за пелени; Органайзери за пелени; Аксесоари за кошове за пелени; Кошове за пелени; Средства за подсичане; Чанти за използвани пелени; Пелени
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Wickelbedarf: Behälter & Warmhalter für Baby-Reinigungstücher; Baby-Reinigungstücher; Wickelauflagen & Bezüge; Wickelauflagen & -aufsätze; Windelsets; Windeleinlagen; Windel-Organizer; Windeleimerzubehör; Windeleimer; Behandlung von Windeldermatitis; Windelbeutel; Windeln
cs: Děti a kojenci > Přebalování: Zásobníky a ohřívače na dětské ubrousky; Dětské ubrousky; Přebalovací podložky a chrániče na přebalovací pult; Přebalovací matrace; Sady na přebalování; Vložky do plenek; Zásobníky na pleny; Příslušenství ke koši na pleny; Koše na plenky; Přípravky na opruzeniny; Nepromokavé pytle na pleny; Plenky
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Change de bébé: Distributeurs et réchauffeurs de lingettes pour bébés; Lingettes pour bébés; Protections pour matelas et plans à langer; Matelas à langer; Kits de couches; Papiers de protection pour couches; Rangements pour couches; Accessoires pour seaux à couches; Seaux à couches; Traitements pour érythème fessier; Sacs imperméables pour couches; Couches
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Αλλαγή πάνας: Διανεμητές & θερμαντήρες μωρομάντηλων; Παιδικά μαντηλάκια; Καλύμματα για αλλαξιέρες & δίσκους αλλαγής; Αλλαξιέρες & δίσκοι αλλαγής; Κιτ για πάνες; Επενδύσεις για πάνες; Οργανωτές για πάνες; Αξεσουάρ για κάδους απορριμμάτων πάνας; Κάδοι απορριμμάτων για πάνες; Θεραπείες για συγκάματα από πάνα; Σακούλες για βρεγμένες πάνες; Πάνες
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Tã/bỉm: Hộp đựng và giữ ấm khăn giấy; Khăn ướt cho bé; Chiếu thay tã và miếng lót khay; Khay và tấm lót thay tã/bỉm; Bộ tã/bỉm trẻ em; Miếng lót tã; Vật dụng đựng tã/bỉm; Phụ kiện thùng đựng tã/bỉm; Thùng đựng tã/bỉm bẩn; Kem chống hăm tã; Túi đựng tã ướt; Tã bỉm
nb: Baby og barn > Bleieutstyr: Dispensere og varmere for babykluter; Babykluter; Trekk for stellematter og -bord; Stellematter og -bord; Bleiesett; Bleieinnlegg; Bleieorganisering; Tilbehør til bleiebøtter; Bleiebøtter; Behandlinger mot bleieutslett; Bleieposer; Bleier
ru: Товары для детей > Пеленание: Диспенсеры и подогреватели для детских салфеток; Детские салфетки; Чехлы для пеленальных матрасиков и досок; Пеленальные матрасики и доски; Наборы для пеленания; Вкладыши для подгузников; Органайзеры для пеленания; Аксессуары для накопителей для подгузников; Накопители для подгузников; Средства от опрелостей; Мешки для использованных подгузников; Подгузники
en: Baby & Toddler > Diapering: Baby Wipe Dispensers & Warmers; Baby Wipes; Changing Mat & Tray Covers; Changing Mats & Trays; Diaper Kits; Diaper Liners; Diaper Organizers; Diaper Pail Accessories; Diaper Pails; Diaper Rash Treatments; Diaper Wet Bags; Diapers
nl: Baby en peuter > Luiermaterialen: Dispensers en warmers voor babydoekjes; Babydoekjes; Hoezen voor verschoningsmatjes en -kussens; Aankleedkussens; Luierkits; Inlegluiers; Luierorganizers; Accessoires voor luieremmers; Luieremmers; Behandeling van luieruitslag; Luierzakken; Luiers
pt-BR: Infantil > Troca de fraldas: Aquecedores e porta-lenços umedecidos; Lenços umedecidos para bebês; Protetores para trocadores; Trocadores portáteis; Kits de fraldas; Forros para fraldas; Organizadores de fraldas; Acessórios para lixeiras de fraldas; Lixeira para fraldas; Tratamentos para assaduras; Bolsas de fraldas impermeáveis; Fraldas
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Previjanje: Podajalniki in grelniki za otroške robčke; Otroški robčki; Prevleke za previjalne podloge in mize; Blazine in deske za previjanje; Kompleti plenic; Vložki za plenice; Organizatorji za plenice; Dodatki za koše za plenice; Koši za plenice; Zdravljenje pleničnega izpuščaja; Vrečke za umazane plenice; Plenice